New Jersey, session 221, A2928.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority shall permit a cosigner to a student loan in repayment status under the New Jersey College Loans to Assist State Students Loan Program to make payments on the loan in amounts to be determined by the cosigner.  Payments made by a cosigner pursuant to this subsection shall be made voluntarily and in addition to any other amounts paid by the borrower of the loan. b.    The executive director of the authority, in consultation with the Director of the Division of Taxation, shall promulgate procedures and forms by which cosigners may certify payments made pursuant to this section and determine eligibility for a tax deduction pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.   (C.        )(pending before the Legislature as this bill). 2.    a.  (1)  A taxpayer with gross income of $80,000 or less shall be allowed to deduct from gross income an amount equal to the amount of the taxpayers payments made during the taxable year pursuant to subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.  , c.  (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (2)   A taxpayer with gross income of more than $80,000 shall be allowed to deduct from gross income an amount equal to 50 percent of the amount of the taxpayers payments made during the taxable year pursuant to subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.   , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    (1)  A taxpayer with gross income of $80,000 or less, who is the borrower of a student loan under the New Jersey College Loans to Assist State Students Loan Program established pursuant to N.J.S.18A:71C-21, shall be allowed to deduct from gross income an amount equal to the interest that the taxpayer paid on the student loan during the taxable year. (2)   A taxpayer with gross income of more than $80,000, who is the borrower of a student loan under the New Jersey College Loans to Assist State Students Loan Program established pursuant to N.J.S.18A:71C-21, shall be allowed to deduct from gross income an amount equal to 50 percent of the interest that the taxpayer paid on the student loan during the taxable year. 3.    The Executive Director of the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority shall, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt any rules and regulations as the executive director deems necessary to carry out the provisions of section 1 of P.L.   , c.   (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury shall, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt any rules and regulations as the director deems necessary to implement section 2 of P.L.   , c.  (C.   ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 4.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 next following the date of enactment.